Washington statutes.
RCW 16.60.076

Proof.

In case of actions for damages under RCW 16.60.010 through 16.60.076, it shall be sufficient to prove that the fence was lawful when the break was made.

[Code 1881 s 2500; 1873 p 450 s 13; 1871 p 66 s 13; RRS s 5453. Formerly RCW 16.04.090, part.]